Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Reach up Program Family Development Plan and Work Requirements

§ 1112.
Family development plan requirements.

Each participating adult in a family applying for or receiving financial assistance shall comply with each Reach Up family development plan requirement provided for in the family development plan, unless good cause exists for such noncompliance as defined by the Commissioner by rule.

The family’s receipt of the full financial assistance amount allowable and avoidance of fiscal sanctions are contingent on the participating adult assisting in the development of his or her family development plan and engaging in the family development plan activities for the number of hours per week that the activities are scheduled and available, unless good cause exists for not doing so as defined by the Commissioner by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2001; amended

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2007, No. 30

, § 9, eff. May 17, 2007.

§ 1113.
Work requirements.

Each participating adult in a family receiving a financial assistance grant shall fulfill a work requirement in accordance with this section. Subject to the provisions of this chapter, and provided that all services required by this chapter are offered when appropriate and are available when needed to support fulfillment of the work requirement, an adult having a work requirement shall obtain employment or participate in one or more work activities, and shall work in accordance with the requirements of this section, in order to maintain continued eligibility for financial assistance and to avoid fiscal sanctions.

The work requirement shall become effective as soon as the participating adult is work-ready, or upon the family’s receipt of 12 cumulative months of financial assistance, whichever is sooner, unless at the end of the 12-cumulative-month period the participant’s case manager concludes that the participant is unable to meet the hours of the applicable unmodified work requirement, as established in subsection (c) of this section. In such cases, the case manager shall prepare a written request on behalf of the participant for an extension of up to six months. The request shall identify the particular reasons why the participant is unable to meet the work requirement and the remedial actions and services to be provided to the recipient to enable fulfillment of the requirement. The request shall be submitted to the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee for approval. The request shall be approved unless the participant is able to meet the work requirement or a modified work requirement established in accordance with section 1114 of this title.
(b) (1) The work requirement shall become effective as soon as the participating adult is work-ready, or upon the family’s receipt of 12 cumulative months of financial assistance, whichever is sooner, unless at the end of the 12-cumulative-month period the participant’s case manager concludes that the participant is unable to meet the hours of the applicable unmodified work requirement, as established in subsection (c) of this section. In such cases, the case manager shall prepare a written request on behalf of the participant for an extension of up to six months. The request shall identify the particular reasons why the participant is unable to meet the work requirement and the remedial actions and services to be provided to the recipient to enable fulfillment of the requirement. The request shall be submitted to the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee for approval. The request shall be approved unless the participant is able to meet the work requirement or a modified work requirement established in accordance with section 1114 of this title.

A participant may meet the work requirement through a combination of work activities until the participant has received 24 months of financial assistance. After that time, the participant shall meet the work requirement through employment.

A participating family shall be deemed to meet the work requirement if:

In two-parent families in which neither parent receives Supplemental Security Income (SSI), a combined total of at least 35 hours a week of employment or work activities or the number of hours the parents have been determined able-to-work by the Department is completed. One or both parents may contribute to the completion of the employment or work activities required by this subdivision.

In a two-parent family in which one parent receives SSI:

If the family includes a child six years of age or older, the work-eligible parent shall participate in one or more work activities for at least 30 hours per week or the number of hours the parent has been determined able-to-work by the Department.

If the family includes a child under six years of age, the work-eligible parent shall participate in one or more work activities for at least 20 hours per week or the number of hours the parent has been determined able-to-work by the Department.

As used in this subdivision (c)(2), “work-eligible parent” means a parent who is not receiving SSI.

In a single-parent family:

If the family’s youngest child is six years of age or older, the participant shall participate in one or more work activities for at least 30 hours per week or the number of hours the parent has been determined able-to-work by the Department.

If the family’s youngest child is under six years of age, the participant shall participate in one or more work activities for at least 20 hours per week or the number of hours the parent has been determined able-to-work by the Department.

A pregnant individual who is employed shall continue such employment unless there has been a medical determination that the individual is unable-to-work, or the individual is exempt from the work requirement based on other criteria established by the Commissioner by rule. A pregnant individual shall not be required to begin new employment.

A participant required to fulfill a work requirement shall accept any unsubsidized job he or she is capable of performing, even if it pays wages that are less than the financial assistance grant. In cases in which monthly wages are less than the financial assistance grant and the family is otherwise eligible, the wages shall be supplemented with a partial financial assistance grant. The Commissioner shall establish by rule criteria for jobs that must be accepted if offered, including the criterion that each job must pay at least minimum wage.
(d) (1) A participant required to fulfill a work requirement shall accept any unsubsidized job he or she is capable of performing, even if it pays wages that are less than the financial assistance grant. In cases in which monthly wages are less than the financial assistance grant and the family is otherwise eligible, the wages shall be supplemented with a partial financial assistance grant. The Commissioner shall establish by rule criteria for jobs that must be accepted if offered, including the criterion that each job must pay at least minimum wage.

A participating adult who had wages in the three months prior to his or her application for financial assistance that, when annualized, equal or exceed 150 percent of the federal poverty level applicable to the participating adult’s family shall not be required to accept employment with annualized earnings of less than 150 percent of the federal poverty level applicable to the participating adult’s family for the three-month period after being deemed eligible for financial assistance, provided that the participant:

has not been disqualified within the prior six months from receiving unemployment compensation benefits for failing, without good cause, either to apply for available, suitable work when so directed by the employment office or the Commissioner of Labor, or to accept suitable work when offered;

is not sanctioned within the three-month period immediately following being deemed eligible for financial assistance;

does not leave an unsubsidized job without good cause within the three-month period immediately following being deemed eligible for financial assistance;

follows through in a satisfactory manner on all referrals to employment opportunities;

is engaged in acceptable work activities in accordance with this section; and

agrees to accept any unsubsidized job if still unemployed after completion of the three-month period immediately following the determination of eligibility to receive financial assistance.

A postsecondary education program participant who has received a degree and any Reach Up participant who has recently completed specialized vocational training shall not be required to accept an unsubsidized job that is unrelated to his or her training or degree for the three-month period immediately following completion of such education or training, provided that the participant:

is not sanctioned within that three-month period;

does not leave an unsubsidized job related to his or her training or degree without good cause within that three-month period;

follows through in a satisfactory manner on all referrals to employment opportunities related to his or her training or degree;

is engaged in acceptable work activities in accordance with this section; and

agrees to accept any unsubsidized job if still unemployed after such three-month period.

The Commissioner may require a participant to participate in a job search, coordinated by the Commissioner, for the number of hours per week that corresponds to the participant’s work requirement hours under subsection (c) of this section, or a lesser amount that in combination with the participant’s unsubsidized employment equals the participant’s work requirement hours under subsection (c) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a participant’s hours of unpaid work activities that are not primarily education, job search, job readiness, or training activities shall not exceed the levels established by the Fair Labor Standards Act. Adjustments required to conform with the Fair Labor Standards Act shall be made pursuant to calculation standards established by the Commissioner by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2001; amended

2007, No. 30

, § 10, eff. May 17, 2007;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. May 20, 2014;

2017, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 1114.
Deferments, modifications, and referral.

The Commissioner shall establish by rule criteria, standards, and procedures for granting deferments from or modifications to the work requirements established in section 1113 of this title, in accordance with the provisions of this section and for referring individuals with disabilities to the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.

The work requirements shall be either modified or deferred for:

A participant for whom no unsubsidized or subsidized job or other equivalent supervised work activity recognized by the Commissioner by rule is available.

A participant for whom support services that are essential to employment and other work activities and identified in the family development plan cannot be arranged. Such services shall include case management, education and job training, child care, and transportation.

A primary caretaker parent in a two-parent family in which one parent is able-to-work-part-time or unable-to-work, a single parent, or a caretaker who is caring for a child who has not attained 24 months of age for no more than 24 months of the parent’s or caretaker’s lifetime receipt of financial assistance. To qualify for such deferment, a parent or caretaker of a child older than the age of six months but younger than 24 months shall cooperate in the development of and participate in a family development plan.

An individual who has exhausted the 24 months of deferment provided for in subdivision (3) of this subsection and who is caring for a child who is not yet 13 weeks of age or a primary caretaker parent in a family with two parents who are able-to-work if the primary caretaker is caring for a child under 13 weeks of age and is otherwise subject to a work requirement because the other parent in the family is being sanctioned in accordance with section 1116 of this title.

A participant who is needed in the home on a full- or part-time basis in order to care for an ill or disabled parent, spouse, or child. In granting deferments, the Department shall fully consider the participant’s preference as to the number of hours the participant is able to leave home to participate in work activities. A deferral or modification of the work requirement exceeding 60 days due to the existence of illness or disability pursuant to this subdivision shall be confirmed by the independent medical review of one or more physicians, physician assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, or other health care providers designated by the Secretary of Human Services prior to receipt of continued financial assistance under the Reach Up program.

A participant who is under 20 years of age, who is a single head of household or married, and who maintains satisfactory attendance at secondary school or the equivalent during the month, or participates in education directly related to employment for an average of 20 or more hours per week during the month.

A participant who has attained 20 years of age and who is engaged in at least 15 hours per week of classes and related learning activities for the purpose of attaining a high school diploma or General Educational Development (GED) certificate or completing a literacy program approved by the Department; provided that the participant is making satisfactory progress toward the attainment of the diploma or certificate; and provided further that a deferment or modification granted for this purpose does not exceed 18 months.

A participant who is enrolled in, attending, and making satisfactory progress toward the completion of a full-time vocational training program that has a normal duration of no more than two years and who is within 12 months of expected completion of such program. Such deferment or modification shall continue until he or she has completed the program, he or she is no longer attending the program, or the 12-month expected completion period has ended, whichever occurs first.

A participant for whom, due to the effects of domestic violence, fulfillment of the work requirement can be reasonably anticipated to result in serious physical or emotional harm to the participant that significantly impairs his or her capacity either to fulfill the work requirement or to care for his or her child adequately, or can be reasonably anticipated to result in serious physical or emotional harm to the child.

Any other participant designated by the Commissioner in accordance with criteria established by rule.

A participant who is able-to-work-part-time or is unable-to-work shall be referred for assessment of the individual’s skills and strengths, accommodations and support services, and vocational and other services in accordance with the provisions of his or her family development plan. The work requirement hours shall reflect the individual’s ability to work. Participants with disabilities that do not meet the standards used to determine disability under Title XVI of the Social Security Act shall participate in rehabilitation, education, or training programs as appropriate. A participant who qualifies for a deferment or modification and who is able-to-work-part-time shall have his or her work requirement hours modified or deferred. In granting deferments, the Department shall fully consider the participant’s estimation of the number of hours the participant is able-to-work.

Absent an apparent condition or claimed physical, emotional, or mental condition, participants are presumed to be able-to-work. A participant shall have the burden of demonstrating the existence of the condition asserted as the basis for a deferral or modification of the work requirement. A deferral or modification of the work requirement exceeding 60 days due to the existence of conditions rendering the participant unable-to-work shall be confirmed by the independent medical review of one or more physicians, physician assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, or other health care providers designated by the Secretary of Human Services prior to receipt of continued financial assistance under the Reach Up program.

Deferments and modifications granted pursuant to this section shall continue for as long as the grounds for the deferment or modification exist or until expiration of a related time period specified in subsection (b) of this section, whichever occurs first.

As used in this section, “health care provider” means a person, partnership, or corporation, other than a facility or institution, licensed or certified or authorized by law to provide professional health care service in this State to an individual during that individual’s medical care, treatment, or confinement.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2001; amended

2007, No. 30

, § 11, eff. May 17, 2007;

2013, No. 50

, § E.323.2, eff. May 28, 2013;

2013, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § E.321.2;

2017, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 1115.
Obligation to fund services; good cause.

A participant’s family development plan requirement under section 1112 of this title and work requirement under section 1113 of this title shall be deferred when the case management services, training and educational services, and the family support services identified in the participant’s family development plan are unavailable for reasons beyond the control of the participant, including when monies appropriated are not sufficient to provide such services.

No family who has been determined to be eligible for child care services pursuant to section 3512 of this title shall be displaced from or denied receipt of such services because the requirements of this chapter result in additional participating families applying for and receiving financial assistance for such child care services.

Services related to child care that are provided to two-parent families in which both parents are able-bodied and who are determined to be eligible for services pursuant to section 3512 of this title shall be paid from nonfederal funds.

The Commissioner shall design the Reach Up program so that it provides access to a full array of services to participating families identified by their family development plans within the funds appropriated by the General Assembly.

The Commissioner shall establish good cause rules for temporary or unexpected conditions or circumstances beyond the control of the participating parent that result in a parent’s inability to participate in a Reach Up family development plan requirement, to participate in a work requirement, or to accept or retain employment.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2001.

§ 1116.
Sanctions.

The financial assistance grant of a participating family shall be reduced, in accordance with the provisions of this section, if a participating adult fails without good cause to fully comply or continue to comply in full with the family development plan or work requirements in sections 1112 and 1113 of this title.

Prior to the reduction in a family’s financial assistance grant resulting from a sanction imposed under this section, the Department shall provide an independent review of the participant’s circumstances and the basis for his or her noncompliance. The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee shall perform the review.

For a first, second, and third month in which a participating adult is not in compliance with a family development plan or work requirement and has not demonstrated good cause for such noncompliance, the family’s financial assistance grant shall be reduced by the amount of $75.00 for each adult sanctioned.
(c) (1) For a first, second, and third month in which a participating adult is not in compliance with a family development plan or work requirement and has not demonstrated good cause for such noncompliance, the family’s financial assistance grant shall be reduced by the amount of $75.00 for each adult sanctioned.

For the fourth and any subsequent month not subject to the reduction required by subsection (e) of this section in which a participating adult is not in compliance with a family development plan or work requirement and has not demonstrated good cause for such noncompliance, the family’s financial assistance grant shall be reduced by the amount of $150.00 for each adult sanctioned.

A participant may cure a sanction by coming into compliance in accordance with the Department’s rules. During the first 60 months of the family’s receipt of financial assistance, a participating adult may have all previous sanctions forgiven by demonstrating 12 consecutive months of compliance with family development plan requirements or work requirements or any combination of the two. Subsequent acts of noncompliance after a sanctioned adult has completed a successful 12-month sanction forgiveness period will be treated in accordance with subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) of this section without consideration of the sanctions that have been forgiven.

[Repealed.]

Under no circumstances during the first six months that a family’s grant is reduced due to fiscal sanctions imposed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall the grant be reduced to less than an amount that in combination with the family’s other countable income is less than the family’s actual incurred housing costs up to the applicable maximum housing allowance.
(f) (1) Under no circumstances during the first six months that a family’s grant is reduced due to fiscal sanctions imposed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall the grant be reduced to less than an amount that in combination with the family’s other countable income is less than the family’s actual incurred housing costs up to the applicable maximum housing allowance.

The Commissioner shall provide the housing costs by electronic or direct payment to the person to whom housing costs are owed. Any balance of financial assistance remaining after the electronic or direct payment has been deducted shall be paid in two payments, the first to be paid within the first half of the calendar month and the second to be paid within the second half of the calendar month.

The financial assistance grant of a family that has been subject to a fiscal sanction for more than six cumulative months shall be reduced in accordance with the full sanction amounts and without any consideration of the housing costs protection established in subsection (f) of this section. This section shall not apply if the family, after the fiscal sanction period of more than six months, has an intervening period of no less than 36 months before another fiscal sanction and spends those months in a state of program compliance, grant closure, or any combination of the two.

To receive payments during the fiscal sanction period, an adult who is the subject of the sanction shall meet no less than once each month to report his or her circumstances to the case manager or to participate in assessments as directed by the case manager. In addition, this meeting shall be for initial assessment and development of the family development plan when such tasks have not been completed; reassessment or review and revision of the family development plan, if appropriate; and to encourage the participant to fulfill the work requirement. Meetings required under this section may take place in the district office, a community location, or in the participant’s home. Facilitation of meeting the participant’s family development plan goals shall be a primary consideration in determining the location of the meeting. The Commissioner may waive any meeting when extraordinary circumstances prevent a participant from attending. The Commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.

A family sanctioned under this section for failure to meet work or family development plan requirements shall remain eligible for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits and shall not, because of such failure, be sanctioned under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program for reasons of “failure to comply without good cause” and “voluntary quit without good cause,” provided that such eligibility and waivers of such sanctions are consistent with federal law and regulations governing the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2001; amended

2007, No. 30

, §§ 12, 13, eff. May 17, 2007;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), §§ E.323.1, E.323.2;

2011, No. 63

, §§ C.105, C.105.1, eff. June 2, 2011;

2013, No. 50

, § E.323.4, eff. May 1, 2014;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. May 20, 2014;

2015, No. 23

, § 53.